Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1115
Unfair trade practices.

A violation of the Viatical Settlements Act, including the commission of a fraudulent viatical settlement act, shall be considered an unfair trade practice under the Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act subject to the penalties contained in the act.

Laws 2001, LB 52, § 41;

Laws 2008, LB853, § 17.

Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act, see section 44-1521.